Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB582.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 204 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding a clause to read:Section 204. Exclusions from Tax.--The tax imposed by section 202 shall not be imposed upon any of the following:* * *(77) The sale at retail of firearms and ammunition. For the purposes of this clause, the following words and phrases shall have the following meanings:12345678910111213141516171819202122 "Ammunition" means bullets, shells or other ammunition designed for use in a firearm."Firearm" means a weapon that is designed to or may readily be converted to expel a projectile by the action of an explosive, or the frame or receiver of the weapon.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0582PN0591 - 2 - 123456